Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-4,120.02
Provisional
operator's permit; violations; revocation;
not eligible for ignition interlock permit.

(1)
Any person convicted of violating a provisional operator's permit issued pursuant
to section 60-4,120.01 by operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection
(3) of such section shall be guilty of an infraction and may have his or her
provisional operator's permit revoked by the court pursuant to section 60-496
for a time period specified by the court. Before such person applies for another
provisional operator's permit, he or she shall pay a reinstatement fee as
provided in section 60-499.01 after the period of revocation has expired.

(2) A copy of an abstract of the court's conviction, including
an adjudication, shall be transmitted to the director pursuant to sections
60-497.01 to 60-497.04.

(3) Any person
who holds a provisional operator's permit and has violated subdivision (3)(b)
or (c) of section 28-306, subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-394, or
section 28-1254, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 shall not be eligible
for an ignition interlock permit.

(4) For purposes of this section, conviction
includes any adjudication of a juvenile.

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 33;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 27.